Washington, session 2025-2026, SB6107.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 18.79.260 and 2025 c 58 s 5019 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A registered nurse under his or her license may perform for compensation nursing care, as that term is usually understood, to individuals with illnesses, injuries, or disabilities.(2) A registered nurse may, at or under the general direction of a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, osteopathic physician and surgeon, naturopathic physician, optometrist, podiatric physician and surgeon, physician assistant, advanced registered nurse practitioner, or midwife acting within the scope of his or her license, administer medications, treatments, tests, and inoculations, whether or not the severing or penetrating of tissues is involved and whether or not a degree of independent judgment and skill is required. Such direction must be for acts which are within the scope of registered nursing practice.(3) A registered nurse may delegate tasks ((of nursing care)) to other individuals in any setting where the registered nurse determines that it is in the best interest of the patient and within the nurse's scope of practice.(((a))) The delegating nurse shall:(((i)))(a) Determine the competency of the individual to perform the tasks, including verifying certification or documentation where required by rule or law;(((ii)))(b) Evaluate the stability of the patient and the appropriateness of the delegation; and(((iii)))(c) Supervise the actions of the person performing the delegated task((; and(iv) Delegate only those tasks that are within the registered nurse's scope of practice.(b) A registered nurse, working for a home health or hospice agency regulated under chapter 70.127 RCW, may delegate the application, instillation, or insertion of medications to a registered or certified nursing assistant under a plan of care.(c) Except as authorized in (b) or (e) of this subsection, a registered nurse may not delegate the administration of medications. Except as authorized in (e) or (f) of this subsection, a registered nurse may not delegate acts requiring substantial skill, and may not delegate piercing or severing of tissues. Acts that require nursing judgment shall not be delegated.(d))).(4) Except as authorized in subsection (7) of this section, a registered nurse may not delegate the administration of medications, tasks involving piercing or severing of tissues, or acts that require substantial skill. Acts that require nursing judgment may not be delegated.(5) No person may coerce a nurse into compromising patient safety by requiring the nurse to delegate if the nurse determines that it is inappropriate to do so. Nurses shall not be subject to any employer reprisal or disciplinary action by the board for refusing to delegate tasks or refusing to provide the required training for delegation if the nurse determines delegation may compromise patient safety.(((e) For delegation in community-based care settings or in-home care settings, a registered nurse may delegate nursing care tasks only to registered or certified nursing assistants under chapter 18.88A RCW or home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW. Simple care tasks such as blood pressure monitoring, personal care service, diabetic insulin device set up, verbal verification of insulin dosage for sight-impaired individuals, or other tasks as defined by the board are exempted from this requirement.(i) "Community-based care settings" includes: Community residential programs for people with developmental disabilities, certified by the department of social and health services under chapter 71A.12 RCW; adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW; and assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW. Community-based care settings do not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities.(ii) "In-home care settings" include an individual's place of temporary or permanent residence, but does not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities, and does not include community-based care settings as defined in (e)(i) of this subsection.(iii) Delegation of nursing care tasks in community-based care settings and in-home care settings is only allowed for individuals who have a stable and predictable condition. "Stable and predictable condition" means a situation in which the individual's clinical and behavioral status is known and does not require the frequent presence and evaluation of a registered nurse.(iv) The determination of the appropriateness of delegation of a nursing task is at the discretion of the registered nurse. Other than delegation of the administration of insulin by injection for the purpose of caring for individuals with diabetes, the administration of medications by injection, sterile procedures, and central line maintenance may never be delegated.(v) When delegating insulin injections under this section, the registered nurse delegator must instruct the individual regarding proper injection procedures and the use of insulin, demonstrate proper injection procedures, and must supervise and evaluate the individual performing the delegated task as required by the board by rule. If the registered nurse delegator determines that the individual is competent to perform the injection properly and safely, supervision and evaluation shall occur at an interval determined by the board by rule.(vi)(A) The registered nurse shall verify that the nursing assistant or home care aide, as the case may be, has completed the required core nurse delegation training required in chapter 18.88A or 18.88B RCW prior to authorizing delegation.(B) Before commencing any specific nursing tasks authorized to be delegated in this section, a home care aide must be certified pursuant to chapter 18.88B RCW and must comply with RCW 18.88B.070.(vii)))(6) The nurse is accountable for his or her own individual actions in the delegation process. Nurses acting within ((the protocols of)) their delegation authority are immune from liability for any action performed in the course of their delegation duties.(((viii)))(7) If trained and delegated the task by a nurse, a nursing assistant-certified or home care aide, licensed under chapter 18.88A or 18.88B RCW, respectively, may administer medications, including those that pierce the skin through subcutaneous injections, and may perform capillary blood sticks.(8) Nursing task delegation protocols are not intended to regulate the settings in which delegation may occur, but are intended to ensure that nursing care services have a consistent standard of practice upon which the public and the profession may rely, and to safeguard the authority of the nurse to make independent professional decisions regarding the delegation of a task.(((f) The delegation of nursing care tasks only to registered or certified nursing assistants under chapter 18.88A RCW or to home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW may include glucose monitoring and testing.(g)))(9) Education and training provided by a registered nurse to a caregiver who is a parent, guardian, or family member who is designated to provide care for a patient is not considered delegation of nursing care tasks, regardless of whether the caregiver is paid to complete the task.(10)(a) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.(((4) Only a person licensed as a registered nurse may instruct nurses in technical subjects pertaining to nursing.(5) Only a person licensed as a registered nurse may hold herself or himself out to the public or designate herself or himself as a registered nurse.))(b) By July 1, 2028, the board shall adopt rules to address appropriate delegation parameters.Sec. 2. RCW 18.79.260 and 2024 c 239 s 15 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A registered nurse under his or her license may perform for compensation nursing care, as that term is usually understood, to individuals with illnesses, injuries, or disabilities.(2) A registered nurse may, at or under the general direction of a licensed physician and surgeon, dentist, osteopathic physician and surgeon, naturopathic physician, optometrist, podiatric physician and surgeon, physician assistant, advanced practice registered nurse, or midwife acting within the scope of his or her license, administer medications, treatments, tests, and inoculations, whether or not the severing or penetrating of tissues is involved and whether or not a degree of independent judgment and skill is required. Such direction must be for acts which are within the scope of registered nursing practice.(3) A registered nurse may delegate tasks ((of nursing care)) to other individuals in any setting where the registered nurse determines that it is in the best interest of the patient and within the nurse's scope of practice.(((a))) The delegating nurse shall:(((i)))(a) Determine the competency of the individual to perform the tasks, including verifying certification or documentation where required by rule or law;(((ii)))(b) Evaluate the stability of the patient and the appropriateness of the delegation; and(((iii)))(c) Supervise the actions of the person performing the delegated task((; and(iv) Delegate only those tasks that are within the registered nurse's scope of practice.(b) A registered nurse, working for a home health or hospice agency regulated under chapter 70.127 RCW, may delegate the application, instillation, or insertion of medications to a registered or certified nursing assistant under a plan of care.(c) Except as authorized in (b) or (e) of this subsection, a registered nurse may not delegate the administration of medications. Except as authorized in (e) or (f) of this subsection, a registered nurse may not delegate acts requiring substantial skill, and may not delegate piercing or severing of tissues. Acts that require nursing judgment shall not be delegated.(d))).(4) Except as authorized in subsection (7) of this section, a registered nurse may not delegate the administration of medications, tasks involving piercing or severing of tissues, or acts that require substantial skill. Acts that require nursing judgment may not be delegated.(5) No person may coerce a nurse into compromising patient safety by requiring the nurse to delegate if the nurse determines that it is inappropriate to do so. Nurses shall not be subject to any employer reprisal or disciplinary action by the board for refusing to delegate tasks or refusing to provide the required training for delegation if the nurse determines delegation may compromise patient safety.(((e) For delegation in community-based care settings or in-home care settings, a registered nurse may delegate nursing care tasks only to registered or certified nursing assistants under chapter 18.88A RCW or home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW. Simple care tasks such as blood pressure monitoring, personal care service, diabetic insulin device set up, verbal verification of insulin dosage for sight-impaired individuals, or other tasks as defined by the board are exempted from this requirement.(i) "Community-based care settings" includes: Community residential programs for people with developmental disabilities, certified by the department of social and health services under chapter 71A.12 RCW; adult family homes licensed under chapter 70.128 RCW; and assisted living facilities licensed under chapter 18.20 RCW. Community-based care settings do not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities.(ii) "In-home care settings" include an individual's place of temporary or permanent residence, but does not include acute care or skilled nursing facilities, and does not include community-based care settings as defined in (e)(i) of this subsection.(iii) Delegation of nursing care tasks in community-based care settings and in-home care settings is only allowed for individuals who have a stable and predictable condition. "Stable and predictable condition" means a situation in which the individual's clinical and behavioral status is known and does not require the frequent presence and evaluation of a registered nurse.(iv) The determination of the appropriateness of delegation of a nursing task is at the discretion of the registered nurse. Other than delegation of the administration of insulin by injection for the purpose of caring for individuals with diabetes, the administration of medications by injection, sterile procedures, and central line maintenance may never be delegated.(v) When delegating insulin injections under this section, the registered nurse delegator must instruct the individual regarding proper injection procedures and the use of insulin, demonstrate proper injection procedures, and must supervise and evaluate the individual performing the delegated task as required by the board by rule. If the registered nurse delegator determines that the individual is competent to perform the injection properly and safely, supervision and evaluation shall occur at an interval determined by the board by rule.(vi)(A) The registered nurse shall verify that the nursing assistant or home care aide, as the case may be, has completed the required core nurse delegation training required in chapter 18.88A or 18.88B RCW prior to authorizing delegation.(B) Before commencing any specific nursing tasks authorized to be delegated in this section, a home care aide must be certified pursuant to chapter 18.88B RCW and must comply with RCW 18.88B.070.(vii)))(6) The nurse is accountable for his or her own individual actions in the delegation process. Nurses acting within ((the protocols of)) their delegation authority are immune from liability for any action performed in the course of their delegation duties.(((viii)))(7) If trained and delegated the task by a nurse, a nursing assistant-certified or home care aide, licensed under chapter 18.88A or 18.88B RCW, respectively, may administer medications, including those that pierce the skin through subcutaneous injections, and may perform capillary blood sticks.(8) Nursing task delegation protocols are not intended to regulate the settings in which delegation may occur, but are intended to ensure that nursing care services have a consistent standard of practice upon which the public and the profession may rely, and to safeguard the authority of the nurse to make independent professional decisions regarding the delegation of a task.(((f) The delegation of nursing care tasks only to registered or certified nursing assistants under chapter 18.88A RCW or to home care aides certified under chapter 18.88B RCW may include glucose monitoring and testing.(g)))(9) Education and training provided by a registered nurse to a caregiver who is a parent, guardian, or family member who is designated to provide care for a patient is not considered delegation of nursing care tasks, regardless of whether the caregiver is paid to complete the task.(10)(a) The board may adopt rules to implement this section.(((4) Only a person licensed as a registered nurse may instruct nurses in technical subjects pertaining to nursing.(5) Only a person licensed as a registered nurse may hold herself or himself out to the public or designate herself or himself as a registered nurse.))(b) By July 1, 2028, the board shall adopt rules to address appropriate delegation parameters.Sec. 3. RCW 18.88A.210 and 2025 c 58 s 5041 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A nursing assistant ((meeting the requirements of this section who provides care to individuals in community-based care settings or in-home care settings, as defined in RCW 18.79.260(3),)) may accept delegation of nursing care tasks by a ((registered)) nurse as provided in RCW 18.79.260(((3))).(2) ((For the purposes of this section, "nursing assistant" means a nursing assistant-registered or a nursing assistant-certified. Nothing in this section may be construed to affect the authority of nurses to delegate nursing tasks to other persons, including licensed practical nurses, as authorized by law.(3)(a) Before commencing any specific nursing care tasks authorized under this chapter, the nursing assistant must (i) provide to the delegating nurse a certificate of completion issued by the department of social and health services indicating the completion of basic core nurse delegation training, (ii) be regulated by the department of health pursuant to this chapter, subject to the uniform disciplinary act under chapter 18.130 RCW, and (iii) meet any additional training requirements identified by the board. Exceptions to these training requirements must adhere to RCW 18.79.260(3)(e)(vi).(b) In addition to meeting the requirements of (a) of this subsection, before commencing the care of individuals with diabetes that involves administration of insulin by injection, the nursing assistant must provide to the delegating nurse a certificate of completion issued by the department of social and health services indicating completion of specialized diabetes nurse delegation training. The training must include, but is not limited to, instruction regarding diabetes, insulin, sliding scale insulin orders, and proper injection procedures.))Nursing assistants are accountable for their own individual actions in the delegation process. Nursing assistants accurately following delegation instructions from a nurse are immune from liability regarding the performance of the delegated duties.Sec. 4. RCW 18.88A.210 and 2025 c 58 s 5041 are each amended to read as follows:(1) A nursing assistant ((meeting the requirements of this section who provides care to individuals in community-based care settings or in-home care settings, as defined in RCW 18.79.260(3),)) may accept delegation of nursing care tasks by a ((registered)) nurse as provided in RCW 18.79.260(((3))).(2) ((For the purposes of this section, "nursing assistant" means a nursing assistant-registered or a nursing assistant-certified. Nothing in this section may be construed to affect the authority of nurses to delegate nursing tasks to other persons, including licensed practical nurses, as authorized by law.(3)(a) Before commencing any specific nursing care tasks authorized under this chapter, the nursing assistant must (i) provide to the delegating nurse a certificate of completion issued by the department of social and health services indicating the completion of basic core nurse delegation training, (ii) be regulated by the department of health pursuant to this chapter, subject to the uniform disciplinary act under chapter 18.130 RCW, and (iii) meet any additional training requirements identified by the board. Exceptions to these training requirements must adhere to RCW 18.79.260(3)(e)(vi).(b) In addition to meeting the requirements of (a) of this subsection, before commencing the care of individuals with diabetes that involves administration of insulin by injection, the nursing assistant must provide to the delegating nurse a certificate of completion issued by the department of social and health services indicating completion of specialized diabetes nurse delegation training. The training must include, but is not limited to, instruction regarding diabetes, insulin, sliding scale insulin orders, and proper injection procedures.))Nursing assistants are accountable for their own individual actions in the delegation process. Nursing assistants accurately following delegation instructions from a nurse are immune from liability regarding the performance of the delegated duties.Sec. 5. RCW 18.88A.230 and 2003 c 140 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) ((The nursing assistant))Nursing assistants shall be accountable for their own individual actions in the delegation process. Nursing assistants following ((written)) delegation instructions from ((registered)) nurses performed in the course of their accurately written, delegated duties shall be immune from liability.(2) Nursing assistants shall not be subject to ((any)):(a) Any employer reprisal or disciplinary action by the secretary for refusing to accept delegation of a nursing task based on patient safety issues. No ((community-based care setting as defined in RCW 18.79.260(3)(e), or in-home services agency as defined in RCW 70.127.010,))facility or employer may discriminate or retaliate in any manner against a person because the person made a complaint or cooperated in the investigation of a complaint.(b) Liability, reprisal, or disciplinary action when administering medications in an emergency response situation if the patient has a prescribed and available medication for that specific type of emergency event.Sec. 6. RCW 18.88B.070 and 2025 c 58 s 5042 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The legislature recognizes that nurses have been successfully delegating nursing care tasks to family members and others for many years. The opportunity for a nurse to delegate nursing care tasks to home care aides certified under this chapter may enhance the viability and quality of health care services in community-based care settings and in-home care settings to allow individuals to live as independently as possible with maximum safeguards.(2)(((a))) A certified home care aide who wishes to perform a nurse delegated task pursuant to RCW 18.79.260 must complete nurse delegation core training under chapter 18.88A RCW before the home care aide may be delegated a nursing care task by a registered nurse delegator. ((Before administering insulin, a home care aide must also complete the specialized diabetes nurse delegation training under chapter 18.88A RCW. Before commencing any specific nursing care tasks authorized under RCW 18.79.260, the home care aide must:(i) Provide to the delegating nurse a transcript or certificate of successful completion of training issued by an approved instructor or approved training entity indicating the completion of basic core nurse delegation training; and(ii) Meet any additional training requirements mandated by the state board of nursing. Any exception to these training requirements is subject to RCW 18.79.260(3)(e)(vi).(b) In addition to meeting the requirements of (a) of this subsection, before providing delegated nursing care tasks that involve administration of insulin by injection to individuals with diabetes, the home care aide must provide to the delegating nurse a transcript or certificate of successful completion of training issued by an approved instructor or approved training entity indicating completion of specialized diabetes nurse delegation training. The training must include, but is not limited to, instruction regarding diabetes, insulin, sliding scale insulin orders, and proper injection procedures.))(3) ((The home))Home care ((aide is))aides are accountable for ((his or her))their own individual actions in the delegation process. Home care aides accurately following ((written)) delegation instructions from a ((registered)) nurse are immune from liability regarding the performance of the delegated duties.(4) Home care aides are not subject to ((any)):(a) Any employer reprisal or disciplinary action by the secretary for refusing to accept delegation of a nursing care task based on his or her concerns about patient safety issues. No ((provider of a community-based care setting as defined in RCW 18.79.260, or in-home services agency as defined in RCW 70.127.010,))facility or employer may discriminate or retaliate in any manner against a person because the person made a complaint about the nurse delegation process or cooperated in the investigation of the complaint.(b) Liability, reprisal, or disciplinary action when administering medications in an emergency response situation if the patient has a prescribed and available medication for that specific type of emergency event.Sec. 7. RCW 70.127.010 and 2024 c 121 s 10 are each amended to read as follows:Unless the context clearly requires otherwise, the definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter.(1) "Administrator" means an individual responsible for managing the operation of an agency.(2) "Department" means the department of health.(3) "Director of clinical services" means an individual responsible for nursing, therapy, nutritional, social, and related services that support the plan of care provided by in-home health and hospice agencies.(4) "Family" means individuals who are important to, and designated by, the patient or client and who need not be relatives.(5) "Home care agency" means a person administering or providing home care services directly or through a contract arrangement to individuals in places of temporary or permanent residence. A home care agency ((that provides delegated))where nurses delegate tasks of nursing under RCW 18.79.260(((3)(e))) is not considered a home health agency for the purposes of this chapter.(6) "Home care services" means nonmedical services and assistance provided to ill, disabled, or vulnerable individuals that enable them to remain in their residences. Home care services include, but are not limited to: Personal care such as assistance with dressing, feeding, and personal hygiene to facilitate self-care; homemaker assistance with household tasks, such as housekeeping, shopping, meal planning and preparation, and transportation; respite care assistance and support provided to the family; or other nonmedical services or delegated tasks of nursing under RCW 18.79.260(((3)(e))).(7) "Home health agency" means a person administering or providing two or more home health services directly or through a contract arrangement to individuals in places of temporary or permanent residence. A person administering or providing nursing services only may elect to be designated a home health agency for purposes of licensure.(8) "Home health services" means services provided to ill, disabled, or vulnerable individuals. These services include but are not limited to nursing services, home health aide services, physical therapy services, occupational therapy services, speech therapy services, respiratory therapy services, nutritional services, medical social services, and home medical supplies or equipment services.(9) "Home health aide services" means services provided by a home health agency or a hospice agency under the supervision of a registered nurse, physical therapist, occupational therapist, or speech therapist who is employed by or under contract to a home health or hospice agency. Such care includes ambulation and exercise, assistance with self-administered medications, reporting changes in patients' conditions and needs, completing appropriate records, and personal care or homemaker services.(10) "Home medical supplies" or "equipment services" means diagnostic, treatment, and monitoring equipment and supplies provided for the direct care of individuals within a plan of care.(11) "Hospice agency" means a person administering or providing hospice services directly or through a contract arrangement to individuals in places of temporary or permanent residence under the direction of an interdisciplinary team composed of at least a nurse, social worker, physician, spiritual counselor, and a volunteer.(12) "Hospice care center" means a homelike, noninstitutional facility where hospice services are provided, and that meets the requirements for operation under RCW 70.127.280.(13) "Hospice services" means symptom and pain management provided to a terminally ill individual, and emotional, spiritual, and bereavement support for the individual and family in a place of temporary or permanent residence, and may include the provision of home health and home care services for the terminally ill individual.(14) "Immediate jeopardy" means a situation in which the in-home services agency's noncompliance with one or more statutory or regulatory requirements has placed the health and safety of patients in its care at risk for serious injury, serious harm, serious impairment, or death.(15) "In-home services agency" means a person licensed to administer or provide home health, home care, hospice services, or hospice care center services directly or through a contract arrangement to individuals in a place of temporary or permanent residence.(16) "Person" means any individual, business, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, public or private agency or organization, or the legal successor thereof that employs or contracts with two or more individuals.(17) "Plan of care" means a written document based on assessment of individual needs that identifies services to meet these needs.(18) "Quality improvement" means reviewing and evaluating appropriateness and effectiveness of services provided under this chapter.(19) "Service area" means the geographic area in which the department has given prior approval to a licensee to provide home health, hospice, or home care services.(20) "Social worker" means a person with a degree from a social work educational program accredited and approved as provided in RCW 18.320.010 or who meets qualifications provided in 42 C.F.R. Sec. 418.114 as it existed on January 1, 2012.(21) "Survey" means an inspection conducted by the department to evaluate and monitor an agency's compliance with this chapter.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. (1) Section 1 of this act expires June 30, 2027.(2) Section 3 of this act expires July 1, 2026.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 9. (1) Section 2 of this act takes effect June 30, 2027.(2) Section 4 of this act takes effect July 1, 2026.(3) Section 6 of this act takes effect July 1, 2028.--- END ---